dev/guesser/guesser.lexc
LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N1 ; 
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR - common variant in both Kazakh and Kyrgyz
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ; 
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>ш%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

%<np%>%<top%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

!%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

! LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

! WAS: (JNW 2015-01-17)
!LEXICON NP-ORG
!
!%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;
! This one doesn't work right because of twol:
!%<np%>%<org%>:%' FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND 

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-ORG-ABBR             ! for abbreviations like FIFA
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-AL-ABBR              ! for abbreviations like ӘЧ - Әлем Чемпионаты
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

! <ord> is "det" is base form, <ord><subst> is "prn" reading

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

!LEXICON DIGITLEX
!
!%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<subst%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;
%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ; ! FIXME: overgenerates a bit

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used for бері<adv>/бергі<adv><attr> 'right now' and similar

:%{I%} ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

! шығар, сияқты etc.

%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON Guesser

<(а | ә | б | в | г | ғ | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | і | й | к | қ | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ұ | ү | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ы | ъ | э | ю | я)+> N1 ;

<(а | ә | б | в | г | ғ | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | і | й | к | қ | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ұ | ү | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ы | ъ | э | ю | я)+> A1 ; 

<(а | ә | б | в | г | ғ | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | і | й | к | қ | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ұ | ү | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ы | ъ | э | ю | я)+> V-TV ;

<(а | ә | б | в | г | ғ | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | і | й | к | қ | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ұ | ү | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ы | ъ | э | ю | я)+> V-IV ;  
